Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-138
Grant.

The county of Grant is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southeast corner of township twenty-one, north of range thirty-six, west of the sixth principal meridian; thence north on said range line to the northeast corner of township twenty-four, north of range thirty-six, west; thence west along the south line of Cherry County to the east line of Sheridan County; thence south along the east line of Sheridan County to the southwest corner of township twenty-four, north, range forty, west; thence west along the south line of Sheridan County to the northwest corner of section three, range forty-one, west; thence south on section lines to the southwest corner of section thirty-four, township twenty-one, north, range forty-one, west, on the fifth standard parallel; thence east along said parallel to the place of beginning.

Laws 1887, c. 22, § 1, p. 345;

Laws 1895, c. 25, § 1, p. 126;

R.S.1913, § 851;

Laws 1921, c. 231, § 5, p. 824;

C.S.1922, § 753;

C.S.1929, § 25-140;

R.S.1943, § 22-138.

Boundary line between Garden and Grant Counties established. State ex rel. Reed v. Garden County, 103 Neb. 142, 170 N.W. 835 (1919), rehearing denied 130 Neb. 145, 171 N.W. 299 (1919).